Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.540

Administrative responsibilities.

In addition to administrative responsibilities assigned in this chapter, the office shall administer the programs set forth in the following statutes: RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 (Washington scholars); chapter 28B.85 RCW (degree-granting institutions); chapter 28B.92 RCW (Washington college grant); chapter 28B.12 RCW (work-study); RCW 28B.15.543 (grants for undergraduate coursework); RCW 28B.15.760 through 28B.15.766 (math and science loans); RCW 28B.15.100 (reciprocity agreement); RCW 28B.15.730 through 28B.15.734 (Oregon reciprocity); RCW 28B.15.750 and * 28B.15.752 (Idaho reciprocity); RCW 28B.15.756 (British Columbia reciprocity); **chapter 28B.101 RCW (educational opportunity grant); chapter 28B.102 RCW (educator conditional scholarship and repayment programs); chapter 28B.108 RCW (American Indian endowed scholarship); chapter 28B.109 RCW (Washington international exchange scholarship); chapter 28B.115 RCW (health professional conditional scholarship); and chapter 28B.133 RCW (gaining independence for students with dependents).

[ 2020 c 18 s 26; 2019 c 406 s 40; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 111; 2004 c 275 s 18; 1998 c 245 s 24; 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 12; 1990 c 33 s 561; 1986 c 136 s 20; 1985 c 370 s 7. Formerly RCW 28B.80.360.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 28B.15.752 was repealed by 2012 c 229 s 902.

**(2) Chapter 28B.101 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2009 c 215 s 15, effective August 1, 2011.

Explanatory statement—2020 c 18: See note following RCW 43.79A.040.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Intent—Purpose—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Effective date—1986 c 136: See RCW 28B.85.902.